Hawaii statutes.
§560:6-108 Financial institution
protection; payment on signature of one party. Financial institutions may
enter into multiple-party accounts to the same extent that they may enter into
single-party accounts. Subject to the provision of sections 236D-12 and
560:6-107, any multiple-party account may be paid, on request and according to
its terms, to any one or more of the parties. A financial institution shall
not be required to inquire as to the source of funds received for deposit to a
multiple-party account, or to inquire as to the proposed application of any sum
withdrawn from an account. [L 1976, c 200, pt of §1; am L 1983, c 217, §8]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next